Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.05.050

Annual meeting of shareholders—Limitations—Terms of directors.

A corporation registered under the investment company act of 1940 that limits the requirement to hold an annual meeting of shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.07.010(2) may include in its articles of incorporation or bylaws a provision establishing terms of directors which terms may be longer than one year.

[ 1994 c 256 s 31.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.